Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-313
Insurer; contract for pharmacist professional services; authorized.

(1) For purposes of this section:

(a) Insurer means any insurer offering any individual or group sickness and accident insurance policy or subscriber contract delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state and any hospital, medical, or surgical expense-incurred policy, except for policies that provide coverage for a specified disease or other limited-benefit coverage, and any self-funded employee benefit plan to the extent not preempted by federal law; and

(b) Pharmacist professional services means professional services provided to patients by licensed pharmacists as allowed by law.

(2) On and after January 1, 2016, an insurer may contract with a licensed pharmacist for pharmacist professional services. Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer from contracting with a licensed pharmacist who is not employed or associated with a pharmacy. Nothing in this section shall require a licensed pharmacist to contract with an insurer for pharmacist professional services.

Laws 2015, LB342, § 1.